Hawaii statutes.
§386-26 Guidelines on frequency of
treatment and reasonable utilization of health care and services. The
director shall issue guidelines for the frequency of treatment and for
reasonable utilization of medical care and services by health care providers that
are considered necessary and appropriate under this chapter. The guidelines
shall not be considered as an authoritative prescription for health care, nor
shall they preclude any health care provider from drawing upon the health care
provider's medical judgment and expertise in determining the most appropriate
care.

The guidelines shall be adopted pursuant to
chapter 91 and shall not interfere with the injured employee's rights to
exercise free choice of physicians under section 386-21.

In addition, the director shall adopt updated
medical fee schedules referred to in section 386-21, and where deemed
appropriate, shall establish separate fee schedules for services of health care
providers as defined in section 386-1 to become effective no later than June
30, 1986, in accordance with chapter 91. [L 1985, c 296, pt of §5; am L 1995, c
234, §8; am L 1996, c 260, §3; am L Sp 2005, c 11, §5]

Cross References

Publication of fees by prepaid health care plan contractors,
see §386-21.5.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next